Hawaii statutes.
[PART
IV.] INSURANCE FRAUD

[§431:2-401] Definitions. As used in
this part:

"Branch" means the insurance fraud
investigations branch of the insurance division of the department of commerce
and consumer affairs.

"Insurance policy" means a contract
issued by an insurer or other licensee.

"Intentionally" shall have the same
meaning as under section 702-206.

"Knowingly" shall have the same
meaning as under section 702-206.

"Licensee" means an entity licensed
under and governed by title 24, including an insurer governed by chapter 431, a
mutual benefit society governed by article 1 of chapter 432, a fraternal
benefit society governed by article 2 of chapter 432, or a health maintenance
organization governed by chapter 432D, and their respective agents and
employees engaged in the business of the licensee.

"Person" means any individual,
company, association, organization, group, partnership, business, trust, or
corporation; but shall exclude:

(1) Insurers, as defined in section 431:1-202, and
other licensees, as defined in this part; and

(2) Licensed attorneys acting in their capacity as
attorneys for a claimant other than the licensed attorney. [L 2009, c 149, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next